Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 11. PUBLIC SAFETY

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY PUBLIC SAFETY

CHAPTER 351. COUNTY JAILS AND LAW ENFORCEMENT

SUBCHAPTER A. COUNTY JAIL FACILITIES

Sec. 351.001. DUTY TO PROVIDE JAILS; LOCATION. (a) The commissioners court of a county shall provide safe and suitable jails for the county.

(b) The jails must be located at the county seat unless the county has only one jail, in which case the jail may be located anywhere in the county at the discretion of the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 64(e), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.002. JAIL STANDARDS. The jail standards prescribed by this subchapter are minimum standards for county jails. Each county jail must comply with the minimum standards and the rules and procedures of the Commission on Jail Standards.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.003. EXEMPTION. (a) A county with a population not large enough to justify building a new county jail or remodeling an existing county jail in order to comply with the standards in this subchapter is exempt from this subchapter if the commissioners court contracts with another county to incarcerate its prisoners.

(b) The county must contract with the nearest county whose county jail meets the standards in this subchapter.

(c) The county shall pay to the other county a daily per capita rate equal to the cost of maintaining its prisoners in the county jail or a daily rate on which the counties agree.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.0035. TEMPORARY HOUSING. (a) On request of the sheriff and the commissioners court of a county, the Commission on Jail Standards shall authorize a county to house a prisoner in a tent or other facility that is not a county jail.

(b) The Commission on Jail Standards shall adopt rules that govern the temporary housing of prisoners, including a specific requirement for:

(1) the classification and separation of prisoners;

(2) the supervision of prisoners;

(3) safety, sanitation, and health;

(4) the structure and maintenance of the facility;

(5) the provision of bunks or sleeping areas for prisoners or other furnishings for the facility;

(6) the space and capacity in the facility; and

(7) the enforcement of a rule the commission adopts under this subsection.

(c) A rule adopted under Subsection (b) must be consistent with the jail standards imposed by or adopted under other provisions of this subchapter unless the Commission on Jail Standards determines compliance is not practicable or reasonable.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 145, Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 1993.

Sec. 351.0036. HOUSING OF CORRECTIONAL PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS. (a) Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 351.0035, the Commission on Jail Standards is hereby authorized to adopt rules governing the temporary housing of prisoners in connection with specific correctional programs which include work camps, wilderness camps, forestry camps, or boot camps.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 145, Sec. 2, eff. May 15, 1993.

Sec. 351.004. STRUCTURAL AND MAINTENANCE REQUIREMENTS. A county jail must be:

(1) structurally sound;

(2) fire resistant;

(3) properly ventilated, heated, and lighted; and

(4) kept in good repair.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.007. SPACE REQUIREMENTS. (a) A county jail cell designed for one person only must have a clear floor area of 40 square feet or more.

(b) Any other housing area or day room in a county jail must have a clear floor area of 18 square feet or more for each prisoner to be confined in the area or room.

(c) The ceiling height above the finished floor in a cell, compartment, dormitory, or day room in a county jail in which prisoners are confined must be eight feet or more.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 952, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 351.008. ACCESS TO DAY ROOM. A cell, compartment, or dormitory used in a county jail for sleeping purposes and designed to accommodate three or more prisoners must be accessible to a day room to which the prisoners may be given access during the day.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.009. SAFETY VESTIBULE. (a) To provide safety to officers and security, entrance to and exit from a cell block or a group of cells or compartments used to confine three or more prisoners in a county jail must be through a safety vestibule.

(b) A safety vestibule must have one or more interior doors in addition to the main outside entrance door to the cell block or group of cells or compartments. All the interior doors must be designed to be locked, unlocked, opened, and closed by a means located outside the cell block or group of cells or compartments.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.010. SANITATION AND HEALTH REQUIREMENTS. A county jail must be:

(1) provided with safe water in ample quantity;

(2) provided with sewage disposal facilities in accordance with good sanitation standards;

(3) provided with food prepared and served in a palatable and sanitary manner according to good dietary practices and of sufficient quality to maintain good health; and

(4) maintained in a clean and sanitary condition in accordance with standards of sanitation and health.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.011. FURNISHINGS OF CELLS, COMPARTMENTS, AND DORMITORIES. (a) A county jail cell designed for one prisoner only must have a toilet, a combination sink and drinking fountain, a table, and a seat.

(b) A housing area designed for three or more prisoners must have one toilet and one combination sink and drinking fountain for every eight prisoners to be confined in the area.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 952, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 351.012. FURNISHINGS OF DAY ROOMS. (a) A day room designed in a county jail for three or more prisoners must have:

(1) for every eight prisoners to be confined in the room, one toilet and one combination sink and drinking fountain; and

(2) for every 12 prisoners to be confined in the room, one shower.

(b) A day room must be suitably furnished.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 952, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 351.013. BUNKS. (a) A cell, compartment, or dormitory in a county jail must have for each prisoner one bunk that is not less than two feet, three inches wide and not less than six feet, three inches long.

(b) Each bunk must have a clean, comfortable mattress and enough clean blankets for the prisoner's comfort.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.014. HOLDING INSANE PERSONS. (a) A person suspected to be or adjudged insane may not be held in a county jail unless the person:

(1) demonstrates homicidal tendencies; and

(2) must be restrained from committing acts of violence against other persons.

(b) A person requiring restraint under this section may be held in a county jail for not more than 24 hours. The person shall be kept under observation at all times.

(c) At the end of the 24-hour period, the person shall be released or taken to a hospital or mental hospital.

(d) A person held under this section shall be kept in a special enclosure or room for that purpose. The special enclosure or room must have:

(1) a clear floor area of 40 square feet or more;

(2) a ceiling height above the floor of eight feet or more; and

(3) a soft covering on the floor and walls, designed to protect a violent person from self-injury or destruction.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 952, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 351.015. ENFORCEMENT. This subchapter is enforceable by the Commission on Jail Standards.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER B. INTERCOUNTY COOPERATION FOR JAIL FACILITIES

Sec. 351.031. CONTRACT. (a) The commissioners courts of two or more counties may contract with each other for the joint operation of a jail to serve the counties.

(b) The contract may provide for the construction or acquisition of a facility or for the use of an existing facility.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.032. LOCATION OF FACILITY. A joint facility is not required to be located at the county seat of one of the counties.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.033. FINANCING. A county whose share of capital expenditures under the contract includes costs of acquiring land or acquiring, constructing, enlarging, or improving a joint facility may use any method of financing that share that would be available to the county if it operated its own jail, including issuing general obligation bonds or other evidences of indebtedness as provided by law.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.034. ADMINISTRATOR. (a) The sheriff of the county in which the jail is located shall serve as administrator of the jail.

(b) The sheriff may decline to serve as administrator by filing a written statement with the commissioners court of that county.

(c) If the sheriff declines to serve as administrator, the commissioners courts of the contracting counties shall jointly appoint a jail administrator. Until an individual is appointed and assumes the duties of jail administrator, the sheriff shall serve as administrator of the jail.

(d) If there is a vacancy in the position of jail administrator, the sheriff shall serve as administrator of the jail until a new jail administrator is appointed and assumes the position.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.035. DUTIES. The sheriff or jail administrator has all the powers, duties, and responsibilities with regard to keeping prisoners and operating the jail that are given by law to the sheriff in a county operating its own jail.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER C. OPERATION OF COUNTY JAILS

Sec. 351.041. SHERIFF. (a) The sheriff of each county is the keeper of the county jail. The sheriff shall safely keep all prisoners committed to the jail by a lawful authority, subject to an order of the proper court.

(b) The sheriff may appoint a jailer to operate the jail and meet the needs of the prisoners, but the sheriff shall continue to exercise supervision and control over the jail.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.0415. COMMISSARY OPERATION BY SHERIFF OR PRIVATE VENDOR. (a) The sheriff of a county or the sheriff's designee, including a private vendor operating a detention facility under contract with the county, may operate, or contract with another person to operate, a commissary for the use of the inmates committed to the county jail or to a detention facility operated by the private vendor, as appropriate. The commissary must be operated in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission on Jail Standards.

(b) The sheriff or the sheriff's designee:

(1) has exclusive control of the commissary funds;

(2) shall maintain commissary accounts showing the amount of proceeds from the commissary operation and the amount and purpose of disbursements made from the proceeds; and

(3) shall accept new bids to renew contracts of commissary suppliers every five years.

(c) The sheriff or the sheriff's designee may use commissary proceeds only to:

(1) fund, staff, and equip a program addressing the social needs of the inmates, including an educational or recreational program and religious or rehabilitative counseling;

(2) supply inmates with clothing, writing materials, and hygiene supplies;

(3) establish, staff, and equip the commissary operation and fund the salaries of staff responsible for managing the inmates' commissary accounts;

(4) fund, staff, and equip both an educational and a law library for the educational use of inmates; or

(5) fund physical plant improvements, technology, equipment, programs, services, and activities that provide for the well-being, health, safety, and security of the inmates and the facility.

(d) For a jail under the supervision of the sheriff, at least once each county fiscal year, or more often if the commissioners court desires, the auditor shall, without advance notice, fully examine the jail commissary accounts. The auditor shall verify the correctness of the accounts and report the findings of the examination to the commissioners court of the county at its next term beginning after the date the audit is completed.

(e) A private vendor operating a detention facility under contract with the county shall ensure that the facility commissary accounts are annually examined by an independent auditor.

(f) When entering into a contract under Subsection (a), the sheriff or the sheriff's designee shall consider the following:

(1) whether the contract should provide for a fixed rate of return combined with a sales growth incentive;

(2) the menu items offered by the provider and the price of those items;

(3) the value, as measured by a best value standard, and benefits to inmates and the commissary, as offered by the provider;

(4) safety and security procedures to be performed by the provider; and

(5) the performance record of the provider, including service availability, reliability, and efficiency.

(g) Commissary proceeds may be used only for the purposes described in Subsection (c). A commissioners court may not use commissary proceeds to fund the budgetary operating expenses of a county jail.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 980, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 578, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 913, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 55, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1005, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1057, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1094 (H.B. 2120), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 351.04155. COMMISSARY OPERATION BY SHERIFF IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) This section applies only to a county that:

(1) has a population of 2.1 million or more;

(2) has two municipalities with a population of 250,000 or more; and

(3) is adjacent to a county with a population of 2.1 million or more.

(b) The county is subject to Section 351.0415, except:

(1) Section 351.0415(b)(1) does not apply to the sheriff of the county;

(2) new bids to renew contracts under Section 351.0415(b)(3) are subject to the approval of the commissioners court of the county;

(3) the sheriff may not make a disbursement from the commissary proceeds unless the sheriff receives approval for the disbursement from the commissioners court of the county; and

(4) the sheriff shall provide to the commissioners court of the county each contract the sheriff makes under this section relating to the commissary and shall provide the contract within 10 days after the date the contract is made.

(c) A purchase made by the sheriff using commissary proceeds is subject to the competitive purchasing procedures contained in Subchapter C, Chapter 262. For the purpose of complying with that subchapter, a reference in that subchapter to "commissioners court" means the sheriff and a reference to "the county official who makes purchases for the county" means the sheriff or the sheriff's designee.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1057, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1094 (H.B. 2120), Sec. 32, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 180, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 351.042. JAIL ADMINISTRATOR IN BEXAR COUNTY. The Commissioners Court of Bexar County may appoint a jail administrator who shall exercise all power, supervision, and control over the jail, including the duties imposed by law on the sheriff with respect to the jail.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.043. FEDERAL PRISONERS. (a) The sheriff or jailer may receive into the county jail a federal prisoner delivered by a federal law enforcement officer unless the sheriff or jailer determines that receipt of the prisoner may violate a state or federal court order, a statute, or a rule of the Commission on Jail Standards or the Texas Board of Criminal Justice.

(b) The sheriff or jailer shall safely keep the prisoner until the prisoner is transferred or discharged by due course of law.

(c) The federal law enforcement officer on whose authority the prisoner is received and kept is directly and personally liable to the sheriff or jailer for the jail fees and other costs incurred in keeping the prisoner. The fees and costs shall be estimated according to laws regulating similar fees and costs in other cases.

(d) In this section, "federal law enforcement officer" has the meaning assigned by 5 U.S.C. Section 8331(20).

(e) Repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 259, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 11.16, eff. Aug. 29, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 259, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 351.044. PRISONER IN ANOTHER COUNTY'S JAIL. A county to which a prisoner is sent due to the lack of a safe jail in the sending county as determined by the Commission on Jail Standards may recover by suit from the sending county the reasonable cost of keeping the prisoner.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 578, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 351.045. EMPLOYMENT OF HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS. (a) The commissioners court of a county may appoint, contract for, or employ licensed physicians, dentists, or other health care providers to provide health care services to inmates in the custody of the sheriff.

(b) This section may not be construed as authorizing a commissioners court to supervise or control the practice of medicine as prohibited by Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code, or to supervise or control the practice of dentistry as prohibited by Subtitle D, Title 3, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 759 (H.B. 1566), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 760 (H.B. 1567), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 975 (H.B. 1568), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Reenacted by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 12.006, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 351.046. NOTICE TO CERTAIN GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES. (a) In this section, "medical assistance benefits" means medical assistance benefits provided under Chapter 32, Human Resources Code.

(b) The sheriff of a county may notify the Health and Human Services Commission on the confinement in the county jail of an individual who is receiving medical assistance benefits.

(c) If the sheriff of a county chooses to provide the notice described by Subsection (b), the sheriff, or an employee of the county or sheriff, shall provide the notice electronically or by other appropriate means as soon as possible after the 30th day after the date of the individual's confinement.

(d) If the sheriff of a county chooses to provide the notice described by Subsection (b), the sheriff shall notify:

(1) the United States Social Security Administration of the release or discharge of a prisoner who, immediately before the prisoner's confinement in the county jail, was receiving:

(A) Supplemental Security Income (SSI) benefits under 42 U.S.C. Section 1381 et seq.; or

(B) Social Security Disability Insurance (SSDI) benefits under 42 U.S.C. Section 401 et seq.; and

(2) the Health and Human Services Commission of the release or discharge of a prisoner who, immediately before the prisoner's confinement in the county jail, was receiving medical assistance benefits.

(e) If the sheriff of a county provides the notices described by Subsection (d), the sheriff, or an employee of the county or sheriff, shall provide the notices electronically or by other appropriate means not later than 48 hours after the prisoner's release or discharge from custody.

(f) If the sheriff of a county provides the notice described by Subsection (d)(2), at the time of the prisoner's release or discharge, the sheriff, or an employee of the county or sheriff, shall provide the prisoner with a written copy of the notice and a telephone number at which the prisoner may contact the Health and Human Services Commission regarding confirmation of or assistance relating to reinstatement of the individual's eligibility for medical assistance benefits, if applicable.

(g) The Health and Human Services Commission shall establish a means by which the sheriff of a county, or an employee of the county or sheriff, may determine whether an individual confined in the county jail is or was, as appropriate, receiving medical assistance benefits for purposes of this section.

(h) A county or the sheriff of a county, or an employee of the county or sheriff, is not liable in a civil action for damages resulting from a failure to comply with this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 778 (H.B. 337), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 351.047. ASSISTANCE WITH REINSTATEMENT OF BENEFITS. The sheriff of a county may enter into an agreement with a third party with experience providing reintegration resources or services to former prisoners under which the third party assists a person who is released or discharged from the county jail with the reinstatement of the person's eligibility for, as appropriate:

(1) medical assistance benefits under Chapter 32, Human Resources Code;

(2) Supplemental Security Income (SSI) benefits under 42 U.S.C. Section 1381 et seq.; and

(3) Social Security Disability Insurance (SSDI) benefits under 42 U.S.C. Section 401 et seq.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 778 (H.B. 337), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 351.048. DUTIES FOLLOWING MISCARRIAGE OR PHYSICAL OR SEXUAL ASSAULT OF PREGNANT PRISONER. (a) In this section:

(1) "Physical assault" means any conduct that constitutes an offense under Section 22.01 or 22.02, Penal Code.

(2) "Sexual assault" means any conduct that constitutes an offense under Section 22.011 or 22.021, Penal Code.

(b) As soon as practicable after receiving a report of a miscarriage or physical or sexual assault of a pregnant prisoner while in the custody of a county jail, the sheriff shall ensure that an obstetrician or gynecologist and a mental health professional promptly:

(1) review the health care services provided to the prisoner; and

(2) order additional health care services, including obstetrical and gynecological services and mental health services, as appropriate.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 424 (H.B. 1307), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER D. CONTRACTS FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT SERVICES ON FEE BASIS

Sec. 351.061. AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT. To protect the public interest, the commissioners court of a county may contract with a nongovernmental association for the provision of law enforcement services by the county on a fee basis in the geographical area represented by the association.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.062. FEES. (a) The commissioners court shall determine the amount of the fee charged by the county. The fees must recover 100 percent of the cost to the county for supplying the law enforcement services, including salaries and any additional expenses the county may incur in providing the services. If the time of the sheriff or county official who provides the services is divided between services to the political subdivision and a nongovernmental association, the total cost to the association must be so prorated, as provided in the contract.

(b) The contract must provide for the payment of the fees to the county. The fees shall be deposited in the general fund of the county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.063. SERVICES BY SHERIFF OR COUNTY OFFICIAL. The commissioners court may request the sheriff of the county or a county official who has law enforcement authority to provide the services in the geographical area for which the official was elected or appointed.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.064. USE OF DEPUTIES. (a) If the sheriff or county official agrees to provide the services, the sheriff or official may provide the services by using deputies. The sheriff or county official retains authority to supervise the deputies who provide the services and, in an emergency, may reassign the deputies to duties other than those to be performed under the contract.

(b) A deputy shall perform duties under the contract in the same manner as if the deputy were performing the duties in the absence of the contract.

(c) A deputy performing duties under the contract remains a county employee subject to the same benefits and restrictions as any other deputy.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.065. REPORTS BY DEPUTIES. A deputy performing duties under the contract shall submit written copies of any felony offense report and subsequent copies of investigative reports to the sheriff and any municipal police department in the county that serves the area under contract.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.066. DUTIES IN AREA SERVED BY MUNICIPAL POLICE. (a) A deputy performing duties in an area served by a municipal police department shall promptly notify the police department of the deputy's receipt and response to a complaint constituting a felony offense and on request shall secure and preserve the scene of the offense for a reasonable time until the arrival of a representative of the municipal police department.

(b) The county and municipal departments shall cooperate in any criminal investigation to the greatest degree practical. However, this section does not prohibit a county or municipal officer from performing any duties that are required of a peace officer.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.067. MUNICIPAL APPROVAL OF CONTRACT COVERING AREA WITHIN MUNICIPALITY. (a) If, under a proposed contract, the county would provide law enforcement services within the corporate limits of a municipality, the county shall submit a copy of the proposed contract to the municipality for approval.

(b) The governing body of the municipality, after considering the individual contract, may disapprove the contract within 30 days after the date the contract is received in the municipal offices. If the governing body of the municipality approves the contract or takes no action for the 30 days, the county may enter into the contract as provided in this subchapter. If the governing body of the municipality disapproves the contract, the county may not enter into the contract.

(c) The municipality and its officers and employees are not liable for any damage caused by the acts of a county official or employee providing services under the contract within the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER E. COUNTY PARK RANGERS

Sec. 351.081. ESTABLISHMENT IN POPULOUS COUNTIES. The commissioners court of a county with a population of more than 3.3 million or a county that borders the Gulf of Mexico may establish a department of county park rangers.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 277, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 102, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 351.082. APPOINTMENT OF CHIEF. The commissioners court shall appoint the county sheriff or other qualified person as chief of the department. The chief shall administer the department under the supervision of the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.083. LAW ENFORCEMENT SERVICES IN COUNTY PARKS. The department shall provide law enforcement services within the county parks of the county and, in a county that borders the Gulf of Mexico, in the unincorporated areas of the county that are located on an island or isthmus.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 277, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 1989.

Sec. 351.084. STAFF; AUTHORITY AS PEACE OFFICERS. (a) To carry out the functions of the department, the chief shall employ county park rangers as peace officers and shall employ administrative staff in numbers approved by the commissioners court.

(b) The county park rangers have the same law enforcement authority that is given by law to deputy sheriffs except that the law enforcement jurisdiction of rangers is limited to the county parks of the county and, in a county that borders the Gulf of Mexico, to the unincorporated areas of the county that are located on an island or isthmus.

(c) The law of this state applying to deputy sheriffs applies, to the extent practicable, to county park rangers.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 277, Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER F. COUNTY CONTRACT WITH PRIVATE ENTITY FOR JAIL FACILITIES

Sec. 351.101. AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT. The commissioners court of a county, with the approval of the sheriff of the county, may contract with a private organization to place inmates in a detention facility operated by the organization. The commissioners court may not contract with a private organization in which a member of the court or an elected or appointed peace officer who serves in the county has a financial interest or in which an employee or commissioner of the Commission on Jail Standards has a financial interest. A contract made in violation of this section is void.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 73(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 952, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 351.102. ADDITIONAL AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT. The commissioners court of a county may contract with a private vendor to provide for the financing, design, construction, leasing, operation, purchase, maintenance, or management of a jail, detention center, work camp, or related facility. The commissioners court may not award a contract under this section unless the commissioners court requests proposals by public notice and not less than 30 days from such notice receives a proposal that meets or exceeds the requirements specified in the request for proposals. Before the commissioners court of a county enters into a contract under this section, the commissioners court of the county must receive the written approval of the sheriff of the county, which written approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, or if the county has a population of 2.8 million or more:

(1) consult with the sheriff regarding the feasibility of ensuring that all services provided under the contract are required to meet or exceed standards set by the Commission on Jail Standards; or

(2) receive the written approval of the sheriff of the county, which written approval shall not be unreasonably withheld.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 73(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 318, Sec. 73, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 667 (H.B. 1544), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 351.103. CONTRACT REQUIREMENTS. A contract made under Section 351.102 must:

(1) if the contract includes operation or management of the facility by the private vendor, require the private vendor to operate the facility in compliance with minimum standards adopted by the Commission on Jail Standards and receive and retain a certification of compliance from the commission;

(2) if the contract includes operation or management of the facility by the private vendor, provide for regular, on-site monitoring by the sheriff;

(3) if the contract includes construction, require a performance bond approved by the commissioners court that is adequate and appropriate for the proposed construction contract;

(4) provide for assumption of liability by the private vendor for all claims arising from the services performed under the contract by the private vendor;

(5) if the contract includes operation or management of the facility by the private vendor, provide for an adequate plan of insurance for the private vendor and its officers, guards, employees, and agents against all claims, including claims based on violations of civil rights, arising from the services performed under the contract by the private vendor;

(6) if the contract includes operation or management of the facility by the private vendor, provide for a plan for the purchase and assumption of operations by the county in the event of the bankruptcy of the private vendor;

(7) if the contract includes operation or management of the facility by the private vendor and if the contract involves conversion of an existing county facility to private vendor operation, require the private vendor to give preferential consideration in hiring to employees at the existing facility who meet or exceed the company's qualifications and standards for employment in available positions;

(8) if the contract includes operation or management of the facility by the private vendor, require the private vendor to provide health care benefits comparable to that of the county;

(9) provide for an adequate plan of insurance to protect the county against all claims arising from the services performed under the contract by the private vendor and to protect the county from actions by a third party against the private vendor, its officers, guards, employees, and agents as a result of the contract; and

(10) if the contract includes operation or management of the facility by the private vendor, contain comprehensive standards for conditions of confinement.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 73(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1299, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Sec. 351.1035. DISADVANTAGED BUSINESSES. (a) In this section, "disadvantaged business" means:

(1) a corporation formed for the purpose of making a profit in which at least 51 percent of all classes of the shares of stock or other equitable securities are owned by one or more persons who are socially disadvantaged because of their identification as members of certain groups, including black Americans, Hispanic Americans, women, Asian Pacific Americans, and American Indians, who have suffered the effects of discriminatory practices or similar insidious circumstances over which they have no control;

(2) a sole proprietorship for the purpose of making a profit that is 100 percent owned, operated, and controlled by a person described by Subdivision (1) of this subsection;

(3) a partnership for the purpose of making a profit in which 51 percent of the assets and interest in the partnership is owned by one or more persons described by Subdivision (1) of this subsection. Those persons must have a proportionate interest in the control, operation, and management of the partnership's affairs;

(4) a joint venture in which each entity in the joint venture is a disadvantaged business under this subsection; or

(5) a supplier contract between a disadvantaged business under this subsection and a prime contractor under which the disadvantaged business is directly involved in the manufacture or distribution of the supplies or materials or otherwise warehouses and ships the supplies.

(b) It is the goal of the legislature that disadvantaged businesses, as defined in this section, be given full and complete access to the process whereby contracts are let under this subchapter. It is also an intent of the legislature that the county and general contractor shall take into consideration participation of disadvantaged businesses having their home offices located in this state when awarding contracts.

(c) It is the intent of the legislature that the county shall:

(1) develop guidelines targeted to disadvantaged businesses in order to inform them fully about the county's contracting and procurement processes and the requirements for their participation in those processes;

(2) develop guidelines to inform disadvantaged businesses of opportunities with the county, including, but not limited to, specific opportunities to submit bids and proposals. Steps that may be appropriate in certain circumstances include mailing requests for proposals or notices inviting bids to all disadvantaged businesses in the county who have requested the county procurement office to place the business on a mailing list;

(3) require prime contractors, as part of their responses to requests for proposals or bids, to make a specific showing of how they intend to utilize participation by disadvantaged businesses as subcontractors;

(4) identify disadvantaged businesses in the county that provide or have the potential to provide supplies, materials, services, and equipment to the county; and

(5) identify barriers to participation by disadvantaged businesses in the county's contracting and procurement processes, such as bonding, insurance, and working capital requirements that may be imposed on businesses.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.104. SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY INAPPLICABLE. A private vendor operating under a contract authorized by Section 351.102 is not entitled to claim sovereign immunity in a suit arising from the services performed under the contract by the private vendor. However, this section does not deprive the private vendor or the county of any benefits of any law limiting exposure to liability, setting a limit on damages, or establishing defenses to liability.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 73(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER G. JAIL DISTRICT

Sec. 351.121. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Cooperating county" means a county that has contracted with one or more other counties for the joint operation of a jail facility under Subchapter B and that has agreed to the creation of the district.

(3) "Director" means a member of the board.

(4) "District" means a jail district.

(5) "Jail facility" includes a juvenile detention facility.

(6) "Receiving county" means a county in which a jail facility constructed, acquired, or improved by the district is located and to which the facility is to be conveyed.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.122. ELIGIBLE COUNTIES; PURPOSE; BOUNDARIES. (a) A jail district may be created by a county or by two or more counties that have contracted with one another for the joint operation of a jail under Subchapter B.

(b) A jail district may be created to finance and effect the construction, acquisition, or improvement of a jail facility to serve the county or counties comprising the district.

(c) A district is composed of the area of the county or cooperating counties that created the district.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.123. PETITION. (a) To create a district, a petition requesting creation of the district must be filed with the county clerk's office of each county in the proposed district.

(b) Each petition must be signed by at least 10 percent of the registered voters in the county in which the petition is filed.

(c) Each petition must be certified as valid by the county clerk of the county in which the petition is filed. On certification, the county clerk shall forward the petition to the commissioners court of that county.

(d) A petition for creation of a district must include:

(1) the name of the proposed district;

(2) an accurate description of the area where the proposed district is to be located;

(3) a statement of the purpose for which the district is to be created; and

(4) a request that the district be created.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.124. HEARING. (a) The commissioners court of each county in the proposed district shall consider the petition for creation of the district at a public hearing.

(b) Within 10 days after the date a petition for the creation of a district is filed, the county judge of a county in the proposed district shall issue an order setting the date of the hearing on the petition by the commissioners court of that county and shall endorse the order on the petition or on a paper attached to the petition.

(c) After the order is issued, the county clerk shall issue notice of the hearing.

(d) The hearing on a petition for creation of a district must be held within 45 days after the date the petition is filed with the county clerk.

(e) A petition may be considered at a regular or a special meeting of a commissioners court of a county in the proposed district.

(f) The county clerk of a county in which a petition is filed shall prepare notice of the hearing that includes a statement of the purpose for the hearing, a brief description of the location of the proposed district, and the date, time, and place of the hearing on the petition.

(g) The county clerk shall publish a copy of the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week for two consecutive weeks. The first publication must be made before the 14th day before the date of the hearing.

(h) At the hearing, a person who owns land or resides in the proposed district may appear and present testimony and evidence to the commissioners court for or against the creation of the district.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.125. GRANTING OR DENYING PETITION. (a) Within 10 days after the date of the conclusion of the hearing, the commissioners court holding the hearing shall grant the petition pending approval by the commissioners courts of all other proposed cooperating counties in the district, if any, if it appears from the testimony and evidence presented at the hearing that:

(1) organization of the district is feasible and practicable;

(2) there is a public necessity or need for the district; and

(3) the creation of the district would further the public safety and welfare.

(b) If the commissioners court is unable to make any one of the findings required by Subsection (a), the commissioners court shall refuse to grant the petition's request for creation of the district.

(c) If a commissioners court of a county in the proposed district refuses to grant the petition's request for creation of the district, the district may not be created.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.126. APPOINTMENT OF TEMPORARY DIRECTORS. (a) If the commissioners courts of all counties in the proposed district grant the petition's request for creation of the district, the commissioners court of the county with the greatest population shall appoint three temporary directors and the commissioners court of each other county in the proposed district shall appoint two temporary directors who shall serve until their successors are elected and have qualified for office.

(b) Within 15 days after the date of appointment, each director shall take the oath of office.

(c) If a director appointed by a commissioners court fails to qualify or a vacancy occurs in the office of director, the commissioners court that appointed that director shall appoint another person to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.127. CONFIRMATION ELECTION. (a) Within 30 days after the date all temporary directors have been appointed and have qualified, the board of a proposed district shall meet and call an election to be held within the boundaries of the proposed district to confirm the creation of the district.

(b) The board shall give notice of the election. The notice must state the day and places for holding the election and the proposition to be voted on.

(c) The board shall publish the notice of the election at least once in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the area of the proposed district. The notice must be published before the 30th day before the date set for the election.

(d) The ballot for the election must be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "The creation of the ___________ (name of each county in the proposed district) Jail District."

(e) Immediately after the election, the presiding judge of each polling place shall make returns of the results to the board, and the board shall canvass the returns and declare the result.

(f) If a majority of the votes cast at the election favor the creation of the district, the board shall declare that the district is created and shall enter the results in its minutes.

(g) If a majority of the votes cast at the election are against the creation of the district, the board is abolished except that it shall declare that the district was defeated and shall enter the results in its minutes.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.128. BOND AND TAX PROPOSITION. (a) At an election to confirm the creation of a district, the board may include a proposition to approve the issuance of bonds and the levy of a property tax by the district.

(b) The board must include in any bond and tax proposition the maximum amount of bonds to be issued, their maximum maturity date, and the maximum rate of the tax that may be levied.

(c) The proposition to issue bonds and levy a tax must be included in the same proposition presented to the registered voters to confirm the creation of the district.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.129. BOARD OF DIRECTORS. (a) The district is governed by a board of directors composed of three directors from the county in the district with the greatest population and two directors from every other county in the district. The board shall manage and control the district and shall administer and implement this subchapter.

(b) Directors shall be elected as provided by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.130. METHOD OF ELECTION; STAGGERED TERMS; TERM OF OFFICE; ELECTION DATE. (a) Two directors shall be elected from each county in the district, except that three directors shall be elected from the county in the district with the greatest population.

(b) At the initial election of directors, the director elected from each county in the district who receives the higher number of votes serves for a term of two years, and the other director or directors serve for a term of one year.

(c) The initial election of directors must be held on the third Saturday in May of the year following creation of the district. After the initial election of directors, an election shall be held in each county in the district on the third Saturday in May each year and successor directors shall be elected for a two-year term.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.131. OATH; COMPENSATION; OFFICERS; QUORUM. (a) Each director shall take the constitutional oath of office.

(b) Each director is entitled to receive compensation in an annual amount not to exceed the salary of the highest paid county judge from the counties in the district, as determined by the commissioners court of the receiving county.

(c) At the first board meeting after the appropriate number of directors are elected and have qualified for office by taking the oath, the directors shall select from their number one person to serve as chairman, one person to serve as vice-chairman, and one person to serve as secretary. If the district is composed of one county, the person who serves as vice-chairman shall also perform the duties of the secretary. The chairman shall preside over meetings of the board, and in his absence, the vice-chairman shall preside. The chairman, vice-chairman, and secretary shall perform the duties and may exercise the powers specifically given them in this subchapter or in orders of the board.

(d) A majority of the directors constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business of the district, but no official act of the board is valid without the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.132. GENERAL MANAGER; EMPLOYEES. (a) The board shall employ a general manager to serve as the chief administrative officer of the district. The board may delegate to the general manager full authority to manage the affairs of the district subject only to orders of the board.

(b) The general manager shall execute a bond. The bond must be in an amount determined by the board, payable to the district, and conditioned on the faithful performance of the general manager's duties. The district shall pay for the bond.

(c) The general manager is entitled to receive compensation in an annual amount not to exceed the salary of the highest paid county judge from the counties in the district, as provided in the district's budget.

(d) The general manager shall employ persons necessary for the proper handling of the business and operation of the district.

(e) The board shall determine the terms of employment of and the compensation to be paid to those employees.

(f) The general manager or a majority of the directors may dismiss an employee of the district.

(g) The board shall require each employee who collects, pays, or handles any funds of the district to furnish a bond. The bond must be payable to the district, in an amount sufficient to protect the district from financial loss resulting from actions of the employee, and conditioned on the faithful performance of the employee's duties and on accounting for all money and property of the district in the employee's hands. The district shall pay for each bond.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.133. DISTRICT OFFICE; MEETINGS; MINUTES; RECORDS; SEAL. (a) The board shall maintain a main office in the district for conducting the business of the district. The board shall maintain any other offices and stations necessary to carry out this subchapter.

(b) The board shall hold regular meetings at the main office at least once each month on a date established by rule of the board.

(c) The board shall keep a complete written account of all its meetings and other proceedings, and shall maintain the records of the district in a secure manner.

(d) Records of the district are subject to Chapter 552, Government Code.

(e) The board shall adopt a seal for the district.

(f) The preservation, microfilming, destruction, or other disposition of the records of the district is subject to the requirements of Subtitle C, Title 6, Local Government Code, and rules adopted under that subtitle.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(90), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 351.134. CONTRACTS; SUITS; PAYMENT OF JUDGMENT; INSURANCE. (a) The board may enter into contracts as provided by this subchapter and shall execute those contracts in the name of the district.

(b) The district may, through its board, sue and be sued in any court of this state in the name of the district. Service of process may be made by serving the general manager. The courts of this state shall take judicial notice of the creation of the district.

(c) A court of this state that renders a money judgment against the district may require the board to pay the judgment from the money of the district.

(d) The board may purchase insurance insuring the district and its employees against any liability incurred under this subchapter and may purchase insurance coverage to cover losses of district property.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.135. GENERAL POWERS. To carry out this subchapter, the district may:

(1) apply for, accept, receive, and administer gifts, grants, loans, and other funds available from any source;

(2) enter into contracts with the federal government and its agencies, this state and its agencies, local governmental entities including the county, and private entities;

(3) conduct, request, and participate in studies, investigations, and research relating to providing a jail facility; and

(4) advise, consult, and cooperate with the federal government and its agencies, the state and its agencies, local governmental entities including the county, and private entities.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.136. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTY FOR SITE; LEASE; EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) The district may acquire by gift, grant, purchase, or condemnation any land, easements, rights-of-way, and other property interests necessary to construct or improve a jail facility.

(b) The district may lease property on terms and conditions the board determines advantageous to the district.

(c) The district may acquire land for a jail facility by condemnation if the board determines, after notice and hearing, that it is necessary. The right of eminent domain must be exercised in the manner provided by Chapter 21, Property Code, except that the district is not required to give bond for appeal or bond for costs in a condemnation suit or other suit to which it is a party and is not required to deposit double the amount of any award in any suit.

(d) If the district, in the exercise of the power of eminent domain, makes necessary the relocation, raising, lowering, rerouting, or changing in grade or alteration of the construction of any highway, railroad, electric transmission or distribution line, telephone or telegraph properties and facilities, or pipeline, all necessary relocations, raising, lowering, rerouting, changing in grade, or alteration of construction shall be accomplished at the sole expense of the district. "Sole expense" means the actual cost of relocation, raising, lowering, rerouting, or changing in grade or alteration of construction to provide comparable replacement without enhancement of facilities, after deducting the net salvage value derived from the old facility.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.137. CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTS. (a) The district may contract with any person to construct or improve any part of a jail facility.

(b) Construction contracts requiring an expenditure of more than $50,000 may be made only after competitive bidding as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 271.

(c) After a construction contract is awarded, if the district determines that additional work is needed or if the character or type of work, facilities, or improvements should be changed, the board may authorize change orders to the contract on terms the board approves. The board may grant authority to an official or employee responsible for purchasing or for administering a contract to approve a change order that involves an increase or decrease of $50,000 or less. A change made under this subsection may not increase or decrease the total cost of the contract by more than 25 percent.

(d) A construction contract must contain or have attached to it the specifications, plans, and details for work included in the contract, and work shall be done according to those plans and specifications under the supervision of the district.

(e) A construction contract must be in writing and signed by an authorized representative of the district and the contractor.

(f) The contract is a record of the district and is subject to Sections 351.133(c) and (d).

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 757, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1266 (H.B. 987), Sec. 12, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 479 (H.B. 679), Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 351.138. CONTRACTOR'S BOND. (a) A contractor shall execute a bond. The bond must be in an amount determined by the board, not to exceed the contract price, payable to the district, approved by the board, and conditioned on the faithful performance of the obligations, agreements, and covenants of the contract.

(b) The bond must provide that if the contractor defaults on the contract, the contractor will pay to the district all damages sustained as a result of the default. The district shall deposit the bond in its depository and shall keep a copy of the bond in its main office.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.139. MONITORING CONSTRUCTION WORK. (a) Until a jail facility is conveyed to a receiving county under Section 351.141, the board has control of any construction, acquisition, or improvement of the jail facility for which it has contracted. The board shall determine whether or not the contract is being fulfilled.

(b) The board shall have the construction work inspected by engineers, inspectors, or other personnel of the district.

(c) During the progress of the construction work, the employees inspecting the work shall submit to the board written reports that show whether or not the contractor is complying with the contract.

(d) On completion of construction work, the employees inspecting the work shall submit to the board a final detailed written report including information necessary to show whether or not the contractor has fully complied with the contract.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.140. PAYMENT FOR CONSTRUCTION WORK. (a) The district shall make monthly progress payments under construction contracts as the work proceeds or at more frequent intervals as determined by the board.

(b) If requested by the board, the contractor shall furnish an analysis of the total contract price showing the amount included for each principal category of the work, in such detail as requested, to provide a basis for determining progress payments.

(c) In making progress payments, the district shall retain 10 percent of the estimated amount until final completion and acceptance of the contract work. However, if the board, at any time after 50 percent of the work has been completed, finds that satisfactory progress is being made, it may authorize any of the remaining progress payments to be made in full. Also, if the work is substantially complete, the board, if it finds the amount retained to be in excess of the amount adequate for the protection of the district, may release to the contractor all or a part of the excess amount.

(d) On completion and acceptance of each separate project, work, or other division of the contract on which the price is stated separately in the contract, payment may be made without retention of a percentage.

(e) When construction work is completed according to the terms of the contract, the board shall draw a warrant on the depository to pay any balance due on the contract.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.141. FINAL APPROVAL AND CONVEYANCE BY BOARD. (a) On receiving the final construction inspection report, the board shall give notice and schedule a public hearing to determine whether the jail facility is complete as specified in the district's plans and in the contract.

(b) At the hearing, the board may require the presentation of any additional information or testimony necessary to make a determination, and the receiving county, if any, may have its representative attend the hearing and present any information and testimony that the receiving county considers necessary.

(c) At the conclusion of the hearing, if the board determines that the work on the jail facility is complete, the board shall pass a resolution to convey the jail facility to the receiving county subject to the requirements of this subchapter if the jail facility is not already owned by the receiving county. The board shall file a copy of the resolution, together with the instrument of conveyance, with the clerk of the receiving county.

(d) The jail district shall make any conveyance of a jail facility to a receiving county as provided by this subchapter free of all interest and indebtedness of the district.

(e) If the board determines that the work on the jail facility has not been completed satisfactorily, the board shall take necessary actions to have the jail facility completed as required by the district's plans, the contract, and the receiving county.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.142. RESPONSIBILITIES OF RECEIVING COUNTY. (a) On completion and approval by the board of the construction or the acquisition and any improvement of a facility constructed or acquired by a jail district under this subchapter and on written approval by the receiving county, the board shall convey the facility to the receiving county.

(b) A receiving county to which a jail facility is conveyed is the owner of the jail facility and is responsible for all operation, maintenance, upkeep, and administration of the jail facility. The district will have no further responsibility for the jail facility. This section does not limit or change the authority of the receiving county to alter, relocate, close, or discontinue operation or maintenance of the jail facility as provided by law.

(c) Conveyance of a jail facility to a receiving county under this section does not affect the duties and responsibilities of the district to pay in full the principal of and the premium, if any, and interest on any outstanding bonds or other indebtedness of the district and to observe and perform the covenants, obligations, or conditions provided by the orders or resolutions authorizing the bonds or other indebtedness. Notwithstanding the conveyance of a jail facility to a receiving county under this section, the district is solely responsible and liable for payment in full of the principal of and the premium and interest on any bonds or other indebtedness of the district.

(d) A written protest alleging that the jail facility does not comply with the district's plans and written approval of the receiving county may be submitted to the board by the receiving county or a municipality in which the jail facility is located before or during the public hearing scheduled under Section 351.141. On receipt of a protest, the board may delay the facility conveyance until the district fully complies with the plans and written approvals.

(e) This subchapter does not prevent the conveyance of a part of the jail facility proposed to be constructed or acquired by a district if the district's jail facility is constructed in stages.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.143. CHANGES AND ADDITIONS TO FACILITIES. (a) Before a jail facility is conveyed to a receiving county, the district may make changes in or additions to the facility if the board determines that the changes or additions are necessary to:

(1) comply with the requirements of that county and, if the facility is located within the jurisdiction of a municipality, comply with the requirements of the municipality in whose limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the facility is located; or

(2) adjust to circumstances or requirements that did not exist at the time the original plans for the facility were approved by the board.

(b) Before changes or additions are made under this section, the board shall consult with the receiving county regarding the proposed changes.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.144. CONTRACTS FOR PURCHASE OF VEHICLES, EQUIPMENT, AND SUPPLIES OVER $5,000. (a) If the estimated amount of a proposed contract for the purchase of vehicles, equipment, or supplies is more than $15,000, the board shall ask for competitive bids in accordance with the bidding procedures provided by the County Purchasing Act (Subchapter C, Chapter 262) except that the bids shall be presented to the board and the board shall award the contract.

(b) This section does not apply to purchases of property from public agencies or to contracts for personal or professional services.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 757, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 351.145. FISCAL YEAR; ANNUAL AUDIT; ANNUAL BUDGET. (a) The district shall be operated on the basis of a fiscal year established by the board. The fiscal year may not be changed more than once in a 24-month period.

(b) Annually, the board shall have an audit made of the financial condition of the district.

(c) The board shall prepare and approve an annual budget. The budget must contain a complete financial statement, including a statement of the:

(1) outstanding obligations of the district;

(2) amount of cash on hand to the credit of each fund of the district;

(3) amount of money received by the district from all sources during the previous year;

(4) amount of money estimated to be available to the district from all sources during the ensuing year;

(5) amount of the balances expected at the end of the year in which the budget is being prepared;

(6) estimated amount of revenues and balances available to cover the proposed budget; and

(7) estimated tax rate that will be required.

(d) The board shall hold a public hearing on the annual budget. Before the 10th day before the date set for the hearing, the board must publish notice of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the district.

(e) Any person who owns land or resides in the district is entitled to be present at and participate in the hearing.

(f) At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall act on the budget and may make changes in the proposed budget that in its judgment the interests of the taxpayers demand.

(g) After the annual budget is adopted, the board may amend the budget.

(h) Money may not be spent for an expense not included in the annual budget or an amendment to it.

(i) As soon as practicable after the close of the fiscal year, the general manager shall prepare for the board a sworn statement of the amount of money that belongs to the district and an account of the disbursements of that money.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.146. DEPOSITORY. (a) The board shall name one or more banks to serve as depository for district funds.

(b) District funds, other than those transmitted to a bank of payment for bonds issued by the district, shall be deposited as received with the depository bank. This subsection does not limit the power of the board to place a part of the district's funds on time deposit or to purchase certificates of deposit.

(c) Before the district deposits funds in a bank in an amount that exceeds the maximum amount secured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the bank must execute a bond or other security in an amount sufficient to secure from loss the district funds that exceed the amount secured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.147. INVESTMENTS. (a) Funds of the district may be invested and reinvested by the board or its authorized representative in direct or indirect obligations of the United States, the state, or any county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision of the state.

(b) Funds of the district may be placed in certificates of deposit of state or national banks or state or federal savings and loan associations within the state provided that they are secured in the manner provided for the security of the funds of counties of the state.

(c) The board by resolution may provide that an authorized representative of the district may invest and reinvest the funds of the district and provide for money to be withdrawn from the appropriate accounts of the district for investments on such terms as the board considers advisable.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.148. REPAYMENT OF ORGANIZATIONAL EXPENSES. (a) The board may pay all costs and expenses necessarily incurred in the creation and organization of a district, legal fees, and other incidental expenses and may reimburse any person for money advanced for those purposes.

(b) Payments may be made from money obtained from the sale of bonds first issued by the district or out of operation taxes or other revenues of the district.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.149. ISSUANCE OF BONDS. The board may issue and sell bonds in the name of the district to acquire land to erect a jail facility and to construct, acquire, or improve a jail facility. The bond proceeds may be used to pay or establish a reasonable reserve to pay not more than three years' interest on the bonds and notes of the district and to pay expenses related to issuance and sale of bonds as provided by the bond orders or resolutions.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.150. MANNER OF REPAYMENT OF BONDS. The board may provide for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds:

(1) from the levy and collection of ad valorem taxes on all taxable property within the district;

(2) by pledging all or any part of the designated revenues of the district; or

(3) from a combination of the sources listed in Subdivisions (1) and (2).

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.151. BOND AND TAX ELECTION. (a) Bonds secured in whole or in part by taxes may not be issued by the district until the bonds and the taxes are authorized by a majority vote of the registered voters of the district voting at an election called and held for that purpose.

(b) The board may order a bond and tax election, and the order calling the election must state the nature and the date of the election, the hours during which the polls will be open, the location of the polling places, the amount of bonds and the proposed maximum tax rate to be authorized, and the maximum maturity of the bonds.

(c) Notice of a bond and tax election must be given as provided by Section 351.127 for confirmation elections.

(d) At an election to authorize bonds payable wholly from ad valorem taxes, the ballots must be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "The issuance of bonds and the levy of taxes at a maximum rate of _______ for payment of the bonds." At any election to authorize bonds payable from both ad valorem taxes and revenues, the ballots must be printed to provide for voting for or against: "The issuance of bonds and the pledge of net revenues and the levy of ad valorem taxes at a maximum rate of ______ adequate to provide for the payment of the bonds."

(e) The board shall canvass the returns and declare the results of the election. If a majority of the votes cast at the election favor the issuance of the bonds and levy of taxes, the bonds may be issued and taxes levied by the board, but if a majority of the votes cast at the election do not favor issuance of the bonds and levy of taxes, the bonds may not be issued and the taxes may not be levied.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.152. FORM OF BONDS. (a) A district may issue its bonds in various series or issues.

(b) Bonds may mature serially or otherwise not more than 50 years from their date and shall bear interest at any rate permitted by the constitution and laws of the state.

(c) A district's bonds and interest coupons, if any, are investment securities under the terms of Chapter 8 of the Business & Commerce Code and may be issued registrable as to principal or as to both principal and interest and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the district or may contain a mandatory redemption provision.

(d) A district's bonds may be issued in the form, denominations, and manner and under the terms, conditions, and details and shall be signed and executed as provided by the board in the resolution or order authorizing their issuance.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.153. PROVISIONS OF BONDS. (a) In the orders or resolutions authorizing the issuance of bonds, including refunding bonds, the board may provide for the flow of funds, the establishment and maintenance of the interest and sinking fund, the reserve fund, and other funds and may make additional covenants with respect to the bonds, the pledged revenues, and the operation and maintenance of those works, improvements, and facilities, the revenue of which is pledged.

(b) The orders or resolutions of the board authorizing the issuance of bonds may also prohibit the further issuance of bonds payable from the pledged revenue or may reserve the right to issue additional bonds to be secured by a pledge of and payable from the revenue on a parity with or subordinate to the lien and pledge in support of the bonds being issued.

(c) The orders or resolutions of the board issuing bonds may contain other provisions and covenants as the board may determine.

(d) The board may adopt and have executed any other proceedings or instruments necessary and convenient in the issuance of bonds.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.154. APPROVAL BY ATTORNEY GENERAL; REGISTRATION BY COMPTROLLER. (a) Bonds issued by a district must be submitted to the attorney general for examination.

(b) If the attorney general finds that the bonds have been authorized in accordance with law, the attorney general shall approve them, and they shall be registered by the comptroller.

(c) After the approval and registration of bonds, the bonds are incontestable in any court or other forum for any reason and are valid and binding obligations in accordance with their terms for all purposes.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.155. REFUNDING BONDS. (a) A district may issue bonds to refund all or any part of its outstanding bonds, including matured but unpaid interest coupons.

(b) Refunding bonds shall mature serially or otherwise not more than 50 years from their date and shall bear interest at any rate or rates permitted by the constitution and laws of the state.

(c) Refunding bonds may be payable from the same source as the bonds being refunded or from other additional sources.

(d) The refunding bonds must be approved by the attorney general as in the case of other bonds and shall be registered by the comptroller on the surrender and cancellation of the bonds being refunded.

(e) The orders or resolutions authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds may provide that they be sold and the proceeds deposited in the place or places at which the bonds being refunded are payable, in which case the refunding bonds may be issued before the cancellation of the bonds being refunded. If refunding bonds are issued before cancellation of the other bonds, an amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds being refunded to their maturity dates or to their option dates if the bonds have been duly called for payment before maturity according to their terms must be deposited in the place or places at which the bonds being refunded are payable. The comptroller shall register the refunding bonds without the surrender and cancellation of bonds being refunded.

(f) A refunding may be accomplished in one or in several installment deliveries. Refunding bonds and their interest coupons are investment securities under Chapter 8 of the Business & Commerce Code.

(g) Instead of the method set forth in this section, a district may refund bonds as provided by the general laws of the state.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.156. BONDS AS INVESTMENTS; BONDS AS SECURITY FOR DEPOSITS. (a) District bonds are legal and authorized investments for:

(1) banks;

(2) trust companies;

(3) savings and loan associations;

(4) insurance companies;

(5) fiduciaries;

(6) trustees;

(7) guardians; and

(8) sinking funds of municipalities, counties, school districts, and other political subdivisions of the state and other public funds of the state and its agencies, including the permanent school fund.

(b) District bonds are eligible to secure deposits of public funds of the state and municipalities, counties, school districts, and other political subdivisions of the state. The bonds are lawful and sufficient security for deposits to the extent of their value when accompanied by all unmatured coupons.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.157. TAX STATUS OF BONDS. Bonds issued by a district under this subchapter, any transaction relating to the bonds, and profits made in the sale of the bonds are free from taxation by the state or by any municipality, county, special district, or other political subdivision of the state.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.158. LEVY OF TAXES. (a) The board may annually levy taxes to pay the bonds authorized under Section 351.149 and issued by the district, but the district may not levy taxes to pay the principal of or interest on revenue bonds issued under this subchapter.

(b) The board may levy taxes for the entire year in which the district is created.

(c) The board shall levy taxes on all property in the district subject to district taxation.

(d) In setting the tax rate, the board shall take into consideration the income of the district from sources other than taxation. On determination of the amount of tax required to be levied, the board shall make the levy and certify it to the tax assessor-collector.

(e) Title 1 of the Tax Code governs the appraisal, assessment, and collection of district taxes.

(f) The board may provide for the appointment of a tax assessor-collector for the district or may contract for the assessment and collection of taxes as provided by Title 1 of the Tax Code.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 351.159. DISSOLUTION OF DISTRICT. (a) After a district has completed all construction, acquisition, and improvement of jail facilities provided in the plans approved by the board and has conveyed those facilities to a receiving county under this subchapter and after all bonds and other indebtedness of the district are paid in full, the district may be dissolved in the manner provided by Subsection (b).

(b) A district is dissolved if:

(1) the board adopts a resolution dissolving the district;

(2) a majority of the commissioners courts of the counties in the district vote to dissolve the district; or

(3) a majority of the registered voters in a majority of the counties in the district vote to dissolve the district in referendum elections.

(c) A referendum election on whether to dissolve a district shall be called by the commissioners court of a county in the district if 10 percent or more of the registered voters in the county petition the commissioners court for such an election.

(d) If, at the time a district is dissolved, the district has any surplus funds in any of its accounts, the board shall transfer those funds to the county entity that assumes jurisdiction over the facilities conveyed by the district, and the county receiving the funds shall use those funds to maintain the facilities conveyed.

(e) On the dissolution of a district, the district ceases to exist and the board shall continue in existence only for the purpose of transferring district funds and disposing of district assets.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 74(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER H. COUNTY CORRECTIONAL CENTERS

Sec. 351.181. ESTABLISHMENT. The commissioners court of a county may establish a county correctional center after receiving the written consent of the sheriff. A sheriff may not unreasonably withhold consent under this subsection.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 3.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 351.182. POWERS AND DUTIES OF SHERIFF. The sheriff of the county in which a county correctional center has been established is responsible for the operation of the center, but must consult with the director of the community supervision and corrections department serving the county about issues relating to probationers participating in county correctional center programs.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 3.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 351.183. PROGRAMS. The sheriff, through a county correctional center program, may:

(1) house and provide work programs and counseling for:

(A) persons convicted of misdemeanors and sentenced to a term of confinement in county jail;

(B) persons required as a condition of misdemeanor or felony probation to serve a term of confinement in county jail; or

(C) persons required to serve a term of confinement in county jail as punishment for violation of a condition of misdemeanor or felony probation; or

(2) in cooperation with the community supervision and corrections department serving the county, operate work programs and counseling programs for persons required as a condition of misdemeanor or felony probation to participate in those programs.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 3.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 351.184. CERTIFICATION. (a) To certify county correctional centers as eligible for state funding under Section 509.011(b)(6), Government Code, the community justice assistance division of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice, with the assistance of the Commission on Jail Standards, shall develop standards for the physical plant and operations of county correctional centers.

(b) The Texas Department of Criminal Justice and the Commission on Jail Standards shall adopt a memorandum of understanding that establishes their respective responsibilities in certifying county correctional centers. The community justice assistance division shall coordinate the development of the memorandum of understanding. The commission and the Texas Department of Criminal Justice by rule shall adopt the memorandum of understanding.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 3.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1990, 71st Leg., 6th C.S., ch. 25, Sec. 6, eff. June 18, 1990; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 7.08, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 351.185. PAYMENT OF STATE AID. (a) On or after the effective date of this section, a county may apply to the community justice assistance division of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for state aid funded in the General Appropriations Act for residential services or the community corrections program.

(b) The sheriff shall deposit all state aid received under this section in the county treasury to be used solely for the purposes of the county correctional center program. The community justice assistance division may audit state aid received under this section.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 3.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 351.186. REPORTS. The sheriff of a county receiving state aid under this subchapter shall submit reports as required by the community justice assistance division of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 3.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER I. COUNTY JAIL INDUSTRIES PROGRAM

Sec. 351.201. COUNTY JAIL INDUSTRIES PROGRAM. (a) A commissioners court by order may establish a county jail industries program. The sheriff may allow inmate participation in the county jail industries program in carrying out his constitutional and statutory duties.

(b) The purposes for which a county jail industries program may be established are to:

(1) provide adequate, regular, and suitable employment for the vocational training of inmates;

(2) reimburse the county for expenses caused by the crimes of inmates and the cost of their confinement; or

(3) provide for the distribution of articles and products produced under this subchapter to:

(A) offices of the county and offices of political subdivisions located in whole or in part in the county; and

(B) nonprofit organizations that provide services to the general public and enhance social welfare and the general well-being of the community.

(c) A commissioners court, in an order establishing a county jail industries program, shall, with the approval of the sheriff:

(1) designate the county official or officials responsible for management of the program; and

(2) designate the county official or officials responsible for determining which inmates are allowed to participate in a county jail industries program.

(d) An order of a commissioners court establishing a county jail industries program, though not limited to, may provide for any of the following:

(1) an advisory committee;

(2) the priorities under which the county jail industries program is to be administered;

(3) procedures to determine the articles and products to be produced under this subchapter;

(4) procedures to determine the sales price of articles and products produced under this subchapter; and

(5) procedures for the development of specifications for articles and products produced under this subchapter.

(e) A county jail industries program may be operated at the county jail, workfarm, or workhouse or at any other suitable location.

(f) An inmate does not have a right to participate in a county jail industries program, and neither the sheriff, county judge, or commissioners nor any other county official or employee may be held liable for failing to provide a county jail industries program.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 578, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1993.

Sec. 351.202. REVENUE. Money received from the operation of a county jail industries program shall be deposited in the general revenue fund of the county to be used as reimbursement for the cost of inmate confinement. The cost to a county for an inmate's participation in a county jail industries program is considered to be a part of the cost of confinement of the inmate.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 578, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER J. COUNTY ADULT SEXUAL ASSAULT RESPONSE TEAMS

Sec. 351.251. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Adult" means an individual who is not a child as defined by Section 101.003, Family Code.

(2) "Response team" means a multidisciplinary team established under this subchapter to strengthen the collaborative response and enhance health and judicial outcomes for sexual assault survivors who are adults.

(3) "Sexual assault program" means a program that:

(A) operates independently from a law enforcement agency or prosecutor's office;

(B) is operated by a local public or private nonprofit corporation either independently or as part of a municipal, county, or state agency; and

(C) provides the minimum services, as defined by Section 420.003, Government Code, to adult survivors of stranger and non-stranger sexual assault.

(4) "Survivor" means an individual who is a victim of a sexual assault or other sex offense, regardless of whether a police report is filed for the incident.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 568 (S.B. 476), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 351.252. ESTABLISHMENT. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the commissioners court of each county shall establish an adult sexual assault response team that includes the following members appointed by the commissioners court:

(1) the chief administrator, or the chief administrator's designee, of a sexual assault program that provides services for the county;

(2) a prosecutor with jurisdiction in the county over cases involving sexual assault committed against adults;

(3) the chief, or the chief's designee, of the municipal police department with the largest population in the county, provided a municipality in the county has a municipal police department;

(4) the sheriff or the sheriff's designee;

(5) either:

(A) a sexual assault nurse examiner or forensic examiner from a facility that conducts sexual assault forensic exams for the county; or

(B) a representative from the largest health care provider operating in the county if the county does not have a professional described by Paragraph (A);

(6) a behavioral health services provider operating in the county or, if the county does not have a behavioral health services provider, a representative from the county health department; and

(7) other persons the presiding officer of the response team considers necessary for the operation of the response team or as recommended by the response team.

(b) Two or more counties, each with a population of 250,000 or less, within a contiguous area may partner to form a multicounty response team.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 568 (S.B. 476), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 351.253. PRESIDING OFFICER. The response team shall elect a presiding officer from among its members.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 568 (S.B. 476), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 351.254. MEETINGS. (a) A response team shall meet:

(1) at least quarterly at a time determined by the presiding officer;

(2) not later than the 90th day after the last day of a regular legislative session to review and amend as necessary any protocols, forms, or guidelines developed under this subchapter; and

(3) at any other time at the call of the presiding officer.

(b) If a response team member is unable to participate in a response team meeting, the member or entity the member is representing may designate another individual to represent the member or entity at the meeting. Each member or a designee of that member must participate in all response team meetings.

(c) A response team member must attend the quarterly meetings held as required under Subsection (a)(1) to participate in response team functions.

(d) A response team shall meet independently of a children's advocacy center multidisciplinary team described by Section 264.406, Family Code.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 568 (S.B. 476), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 351.255. VACANCIES. The commissioners court of a county shall fill a vacancy for a response team member not later than the 30th day after the date the vacancy occurs and in the same manner as the original appointment.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 568 (S.B. 476), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 351.256. ADULT SEXUAL ASSAULT RESPONSE PROTOCOL. (a) A response team shall develop a written protocol addressing the coordinated response for adult survivors in the county that includes:

(1) the procedures to be used in investigating and prosecuting cases arising from a report of sexual assault;

(2) interagency information sharing, in accordance with state and federal law, to ensure the timely exchange of relevant information and enhance the response to survivors;

(3) the location and accessibility of sexual assault forensic examinations;

(4) information on the availability of and access to medical care when the care is clinically indicated;

(5) a requirement to ensure survivors are offered access to sexual assault program advocates, as defined by Section 420.003, Government Code;

(6) information on the availability of and access to mental and behavioral health services;

(7) a requirement to ensure that relevant law enforcement agencies notify survivors in a timely manner regarding the status of any criminal case and court proceeding;

(8) an assessment of relevant community trends, including drug-facilitated sexual assault, the incidence of predatory date rape, and sex trafficking;

(9) a biennial evaluation through sexual assault case reviews of the effectiveness of individual agency and interagency protocols and systems;

(10) at least four hours of annual cross-agency training on the dynamics of sexual assault for response team members participating in the quarterly meetings as required by Section 351.254(c); and

(11) procedures for addressing conflicts within the response team and for maintaining the confidentiality of information shared among response team members as required by law.

(b) In developing a protocol under this section, the response team:

(1) shall consider Chapter 56A, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(2) may provide different procedures for use within a particular municipality or area of the county served by the response team; and

(3) shall prioritize the health and safety of survivors.

(c) The purpose of the protocol developed under this section is to ensure coordination between all agencies involved in sexual assault cases to increase the efficacy of response and to minimize survivor traumatization. The response team shall provide the protocol to each agency in the county that responds to disclosures of sexual assault.

(d) Failure to follow a protocol developed under this section does not:

(1) constitute the basis for a claim or defense to a civil or criminal action; or

(2) preclude the admissibility of evidence.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 568 (S.B. 476), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 351.257. REPORT. Not later than December 1 of each odd-numbered year, a response team shall provide to the commissioners court of each county the response team serves a report that includes:

(1) a list of response team members able to participate in the quarterly meetings required by Section 351.254(c);

(2) a copy of the written protocol developed under Section 351.256; and

(3) either:

(A) a biennial summary detailing:

(i) the number of sexual assault reports received by local law enforcement agencies;

(ii) the number of investigations conducted as a result of those reports;

(iii) the number of indictments presented in connection with a report and the disposition of those cases; and

(iv) the number of reports of sexual assault for which no indictment was presented; or

(B) an explanation of the reason the response team failed to provide the information described by Paragraph (A).

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 568 (S.B. 476), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 351.258. MEETINGS AND RECORDS; CONFIDENTIALITY. (a) A response team meeting is not subject to Chapter 551, Government Code.

(b) This section does not prohibit a response team from requesting or allowing the attendance of a person who is not a response team member at a response team meeting.

(c) Information and records acquired by a response team in the exercise of its purpose and duties under this subchapter are confidential and not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, and may only be disclosed as necessary to implement the response team's purpose and duties.

(d) A report or a statistical compilation of data reports created by the response team is public information subject to Chapter 552, Government Code, provided the report or compilation does not contain any personally identifiable information.

(e) Information, documents, and records of the response team that are confidential under this section are not subject to subpoena or discovery and may not be introduced into evidence in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding, except that information, documents, and records otherwise available from other sources are not immune from subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence solely because that information or those documents or records were presented during a response team meeting or maintained by the response team.

(f) A response team may only review a sexual assault case of an adult survivor with the signed, written consent of the survivor. The consent must specify:

(1) the information or records covered by the release;

(2) the reason or purpose for the release; and

(3) the person or agency to which the information is to be released.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 568 (S.B. 476), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER Z. MISCELLANEOUS LAW ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS

Sec. 351.901. DONATION TO CERTAIN CRIME STOPPERS AND CRIME PREVENTION ORGANIZATIONS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Crime stoppers organization" means a private, nonprofit organization or a public organization that:

(A) is operated on a local or statewide level;

(B) accepts donations and expends funds for rewards to persons who submit tips under Section 414.0015(a), Government Code; and

(C) forwards the information received from tips to the appropriate law enforcement agency, school district, or open-enrollment charter school as provided by Section 414.0015(b), Government Code.

(2) "Crime prevention organization" means an organization with an advisory council consisting of local law enforcement officers and volunteers from the community that:

(A) is operated on a local or statewide level;

(B) identifies crime-related issues relevant to a segment of society particularly prone to victimization, including the elderly population; and

(C) provides assistance to the community in the form of crime prevention and education and provides training for law enforcement officers in dealing effectively with the segment of society prone to victimization.

(3) "Open-enrollment charter school" means a school that has been granted a charter under Subchapter D, Chapter 12, Education Code.

(4) "School district" means a public school district created under the laws of this state.

(b) The commissioners court of a county by contract may donate money to one or more crime stoppers or crime prevention organizations for expenditure by the organizations to meet the goals identified in Subsection (a). The total amount of all donations made in a calendar year may not exceed:

(1) $25,000; or

(2) $100,000, for a county with a population of 1.2 million or more.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 700, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 417 (H.B. 3067), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1172 (H.B. 3316), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 181, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 351.902. BUREAU OF CRIMINAL IDENTIFICATION. (a) On written and sworn application by a sheriff stating the necessity for the purchase, the commissioners court may purchase equipment for a bureau of criminal identification.

(b) The equipment must be compatible with the equipment used for this purpose by the Department of Public Safety, the United States Department of Justice, or the United States Bureau of Criminal Identification. The equipment may include items such as cameras, fingerprint cards, inks, chemicals, microscopes, radio and laboratory equipment, filing cards, filing cabinets, and tear gas.

(c) A purchase allowed under this section must be made by the sheriff by requisition in the manner provided by the county auditor or, if the county does not have a county auditor, by the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 351.904. ELECTRONIC MONITORING PROGRAM. (a) A commissioners court of a county may establish and operate an electronic monitoring program for the purpose of monitoring defendants required by a court of the county to participate in an electronic monitoring program under:

(1) Article 43.09, Code of Criminal Procedure, to discharge a fine or costs; or

(2) Article 42.035, Code of Criminal Procedure, as an alternative to serving all or part of a sentence of confinement in county jail.

(b) The commissioners court shall provide for the sheriff or the community supervision and corrections department serving the county, under an agreement with the commissioners court, to oversee and operate, or, if the program is operated by a private vendor under Subsection (c), oversee the operation of, an electronic monitoring program established under this section.

(c) A commissioners court may contract with a private vendor to operate an electronic monitoring program under this section, including by enrolling and tracking participants in the program and performing periodic reviews with participants regarding compliance with the program.

(d) A commissioners court may use money that a defendant is ordered to pay to a county under Article 42.035(c), Code of Criminal Procedure, to pay for the services of a private vendor that operates an electronic monitoring program under Subsection (c).

(e) A commissioners court may subsidize all or part of the cost of a defendant's participation in an electronic monitoring program under this section if the defendant is indigent.

(f) A commissioners court may contract for any available electronic monitoring technology, including a technology that provides continuous positional tracking of the participant, that meets the approval of the commissioners court and either the sheriff or the community supervision and corrections department, as appropriate.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 854 (S.B. 2340), Sec. 6, eff. June 19, 2009.